California statutes. Education Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 357, Sec. 13.   (SB 97)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

35737.

Plans and recommendations may include a provision specifying that the election for the first governing board will be held at the same time as the election on the reorganization of the school districts. If such a provision is included, it shall specify the method whereby the length of the initial terms may be determined so that the governing board will ultimately have staggered terms which expire in years with regular election dates. In the absence of such a provision, the election of the first governing board will take place on the first regular election following the passage of the reorganization proposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35738.

Plans and recommendations may include a method of dividing the bonded indebtedness other than the method specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 35576 for the purpose of providing greater equity in the division. Consideration may be given to the assessed valuation, number of pupils, property values, and other matters which the petitioners or county committee deems pertinent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Fiscal Actions of Newly Organized or Reorganized School Districts [35740. - 35740.]

35740.

In addition to satisfying the requirements of subdivision (j) of Section 42127.6, upon the approval of a petition for reorganization and continuing after the certification of the election results for an action to reorganize a school district pursuant to Section 35763, or upon the appointment of an interim governing board pursuant to Section 35100, until the effective date of the reorganized district in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 35530) of Chapter 3, an affected district is subject to all of the following:

(a) (1) The interim board or the governing board of the original district or districts, and, where applicable, the administrators of the original district or districts, shall notify the county
 superintendent of schools in writing, and provide relevant documents and information no less than 10 schooldays before taking any action on any matter that could have a material fiscal impact on, or impose a debt or liability on, the original, proposed, or reorganized school district.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, failure to provide the notice and relevant documents and information required by paragraph (1) shall nullify the action taken by the board or administrator of the affected district or districts.

(3) As used in this section, “schoolday” means a day upon which the schools of the district are in session or nonholiday weekdays during the summer recess.

(b) The county superintendent of schools may review any action taken or proposed to be taken by any interim or existing governing board or school district
 administrators to determine whether that action would have a material fiscal impact, debt, or liability on the original, proposed, or reorganized school district. If, based on the review of the county superintendent of schools, the county superintendent of schools determines that the action or proposed action would have a material fiscal impact on the original, proposed, or reorganized school district, and that action is unnecessary for the immediate functioning of the original or reorganized school district, the county superintendent of schools may stay or rescind that action. The county superintendent of schools shall inform the original or interim reorganized school district governing board or the school district administrators in writing of his or her justification for the exercise of authority under this subdivision to stay or rescind any action of the interim or original school district governing board.

(c) A school district shall provide
 any documents or information requested by the county superintendent of schools in a timely manner related to proposed actions that are under review pursuant to this section.

(d) The provisions of this section shall apply irrespective of a school district’s budget or certification status under Article 2 (commencing with Section 42120) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 42130) of Chapter 6 of Part 24.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 30.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Approval and Adoption of Plans and Recommendations [35750. - 35768.]

35750.

The State Board of Education shall establish minimum standards which it shall apply in approving or disapproving petitions and proposals for the formation or reorganization of school districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35751.

When it is necessary for the State Board of Education to consider petitions submitted under this chapter and prepare a proposal relating to such a petition, each county superintendent of schools and every other county officer in the counties affected, and the district superintendent of the school districts affected shall provide the statistical information required by the Department of Education to complete the study.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35752.

(a) When a petition for the reorganization of a school district is received in the office of the secretary of the state board, the secretary shall set the petition for hearing at a regular or special meeting of the state board. At least 30 days prior to the date of the hearing, he or she shall send by registered mail a notice containing a general statement of the purpose of the petition and the time and place of the hearing to each of the following persons or agencies:

(1) The governing board and district superintendent of each school district whose boundaries would be affected.

(2) The county superintendent and county committee of each county that has jurisdiction over any of the districts whose boundaries would be affected.

(3) The persons designated in the petition as “chief petitioners.”

(b) A petition for the reorganization of a school district initiated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 35700, and transmitted to the state board pursuant to Section 35707, shall be withdrawn from consideration if both of the following occur:

(1) A majority of the members of the governing board of each school district initiating the petition approves a resolution requesting withdrawal of the petition.

(2) The county committee on school district organization transmitting the petition to the state board approves a resolution supporting withdrawal of the petition.

(c) A resolution for the reorganization of a school district initiated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35721 and transmitted to the state board pursuant to Section 35722 shall be withdrawn from consideration if the state board receives a resolution from the county committee on school district organization transmitting the petition to the state board requesting withdrawal of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 730, Sec. 8.5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

35753.

(a) The state board may approve proposals for the reorganization of school districts, if the state board has determined, with respect to the proposal and the resulting school districts, that all of the following conditions are substantially met:

(1) The reorganized districts will be adequate in terms of number of pupils enrolled.

(2) The school districts are each organized on the basis of a substantial community identity.

(3) The proposal will result in an equitable division of property and facilities of the original district or districts.

(4) The reorganization of the school districts will preserve each affected district’s ability to educate pupils in an integrated environment and will not promote racial or ethnic discrimination or segregation.

(5) Any increase in costs to the state as a result of the proposed reorganization will be insignificant and otherwise incidental to the reorganization.

(6) The proposed reorganization will continue to promote sound education performance and will not significantly disrupt the educational programs in the affected districts.

(7) Any increase in school facilities costs as a result of the proposed reorganization will be insignificant and otherwise incidental to the reorganization.

(8) The
 proposed reorganization is primarily designed for purposes other than to significantly increase property values.

(9) The proposed reorganization will continue to promote sound fiscal management and not cause a substantial negative effect on the fiscal status of the affected district.

(10) Any other criteria that the state board may, by regulation, prescribe.

(b) The state board may approve a proposal for the reorganization of school districts if the state board determines that it is not practical or possible to apply the criteria of this section literally, and that the circumstances with respect to the proposals provide an exceptional situation sufficient to justify approval of the proposals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 31.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35754.

After affording interested persons an opportunity to present their views on the petition to reorganize school districts, and after hearing any findings and recommendations of the Superintendent, the state board shall approve or disapprove the petition. If the state board approves the petition, it may amend or include in the proposal any of the appropriate provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 35730).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 32.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35755.

After the state board has approved the plans and recommendations for the unification or other reorganization of the school districts in any area, including approval through affirmation or reversal of the action of a county committee, the secretary of the state board shall give notice of the approval to the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over any of the school districts whose boundaries or status would be affected by the reorganization as proposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 33.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35756.

The county superintendent of schools, within 35 days after receiving the notification provided by Section 35755, shall call an election, to be conducted at the next election of any kind in the territory of districts as determined by the state board, in accordance with either of the following:

(a) Section 1002 of the Elections Code and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 1 of Title 1 of this code.

(b) Division 4 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 301, Sec. 7.   (SB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

35756.5.

In the case of the transfer of territory from one district to another, if the transfer is opposed by the governing boards of one or more of the districts affected with an average daily attendance of 900 or less, the territory in which the election is held shall include the entire territory of the districts opposing the transfer. Each district with an average daily attendance of 900 or less which is included in an election because of the objection of its governing board to the transfer shall bear the additional cost of holding the election in that portion of its territory not otherwise included in the election. When a majority of the votes cast in the school district opposing the transfer and a majority of the votes cast in the entire territory in which the election is held are in favor of the reorganization, the proposal carries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 917, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

35757.

The county superintendent of schools shall prepare a statement of official information and statistics relating to the proposed reorganization that shall include, but is not limited to, the plans and recommendations, the local control funding formula allocation pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, per pupil, the rate of growth, the expected enrollment, and the support from the state that can be expected if such area maintains an adequate school program. Such statistics shall be based upon the school year last completed before the date of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 31.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

35758.

The county superintendent of schools calling the election shall cause to be prepared and distributed a statement setting forth arguments for and against the recommendations. The argument shall not exceed 500 words. The argument in favor of the recommendation shall be prepared by the president of the county board or by a proponent of the recommendations designated by the president. The arguments against the recommendations shall be prepared by a member of the county board who voted against the recommendations, or, if there be none, by an elector designated by the county superintendent of schools who has appeared before the board or at a public hearing in opposition to the recommendation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35759.

The cost of preparation and distribution of the statement setting forth the arguments in favor of, and those opposed to, the recommendations of the county board, and the cost of any election held pursuant to this article shall be a charge against the general fund of the county. If the proposed reorganized district is situated in more than one county, the cost of the election shall be prorated against each county in the same proportion as the assessed valuation of the territory of the proposed reorganized district lying in that county bears to the total assessed valuation of the proposed reorganized districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 34.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35760.

(a) Any circular, pamphlet, letter, poster, or other campaign literature which is designed to promote either the passage or defeat of a ballot measure proposing the reorganization of school districts shall bear on its face, in a conspicuous place, either of the following:

(1) The names and residence addresses of the chairmen and secretary, or the names and residence addresses of at least two officers of the organization issuing it, if issued by an organization.

(2) The name and residence address, with the street and number, if any, of any individual responsible for it, if issued by an individual or individuals.

(b) If any person eligible to vote upon such ballot measure has reason to believe that such campaign literature contains false and misleading statements, he or she may bring an action in the superior court for injunctive relief against further circulation of the literature, and if the court finds that the literature does, in fact, contain false and misleading statements, it may enjoin any further circulation of the literature.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35761.

Every qualified elector residing within the territory in which the election is called shall be eligible to vote at such election.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35762.

(a) The words to appear upon the ballots used for voting upon the adoption or rejection of the proposals for the reorganization of school districts shall be “Shall the school districts be reorganized as proposed?”, or words of similar import. To the right of or below those words, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the proposal. If the voter marks the voting target next to the
 printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.

(b) If the plans and recommendations include a proposal for trustee areas in accordance with Section 35734, such proposal shall be considered a part of the reorganization proposition to be voted upon, and the ballot shall include wording to that effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 9.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35763.

Upon the completion of the canvass of the election returns and the vote by mail ballots, the county superintendent of schools shall tabulate the returns and the vote by mail ballots, and notify the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the board of supervisors and the governing board of each affected school district of the number of votes cast for, and the number of votes cast against, the reorganization of school districts in each school district and also the total number of votes cast for, and the total number of votes cast against, the reorganization of school districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

35764.

When a majority of all the votes cast are cast in favor of the reorganization or other proposal, the proposal carries.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35765.

After the board of supervisors receives a proper certificate of election or other proper evidence that an action to organize or reorganize school districts has been approved as provided by law, the board of supervisors shall make an order to create, change, or terminate school districts as may be required by the action and establish or reestablish the boundaries of the districts affected by the action. The order shall be entered in the county’s record of school districts.

If the action results in the creation of a district or a change of district boundaries of the type described in Section 54900 of the Government Code, the order of the board of supervisors shall include the legal description of each district created or changed in the action and, immediately after making the order, the board of supervisors shall cause a copy of the order and a map or plat indicating the boundaries established or reestablished for each district affected by the order to be filed as required by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900) of Part 1 of Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35766.

After the expiration of one year from the date of the order, the order shall be conclusive evidence that the school district has been legally organized, or the boundaries legally changed, as the case may be, and no suit shall be maintained which questions the validity of the organization or change of boundaries.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35767.

Except as otherwise provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 35100) of Chapter 2 of Part 21, and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 35101, the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction may consolidate the election for the purpose of electing the governing board of a unified school district proposed to be formed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4200) of Part 3 with the election held for adopting or rejecting the plans and recommendations for the formation of a new district. The election shall be called, held, and conducted pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Chapter 1 of Part 4, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5300) of Part 4, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 35100) of Chapter 2 of Part 21, except that the question of formation of a unified school district and any other proposition to be voted upon shall appear on the ballot before the list of candidates for election to the governing board of the proposed unified district.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 35104 by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 191.)
-------------------------------------------

35768.

The State Board of Education may adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of this article, as it deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1658, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Lapsation [35780. - 35787.]

35780.

(a) A school district that has been organized for more than three years shall be lapsed as provided in this article if the number of registered electors in the school district is less than six or if the average daily attendance of pupils in the school or schools maintained by the school district is less than six in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, or is less than 11 in grades 9 to 12, inclusive. The county board of education may defer the lapsation of the school district for one year upon adoption of a resolution approved by a majority of the members of the governing board of the school district and written concurrence of the county superintendent of schools.

(b) For a new district that has been unable to provide the school facilities necessary for instructional services by employees of the school district to all of the pupils who are residents of the school district after five years from the date that the reorganization became effective, the county committee on school district organization, upon direction from the state board, shall initiate lapsation procedures pursuant to Section 35783 or revert the reorganized district to its original status.

(c) A school district may also be lapsed when there are no school facilities or sites on which to maintain any school in the school district.

(d) A school district may also be
 lapsed upon adoption of a resolution approved by a majority of the members of the governing board of the school district and written concurrence of the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 13.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

35780.1.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

 (a) “Lapse” means dissolving a school district and annexing the entire territory of that school district to one or more adjoining school districts.

(b) “Lapsation” means an action to lapse as defined by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 36.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35781.

The attendance of pupils residing in a unified district in high schools in an adjoining state pursuant to Section 44618 or Article 1 (commencing with Section 2000) of Chapter 7 of Part 2, shall be deemed for the purposes of this article to be in high schools established and maintained by the unified district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35782.

Within 45 days before the close of each school year, the county committee shall conduct a public hearing on the issues specified in Section 35780. Notice of the public hearing shall be given at least 10 days in advance of the hearing to each member of the governing board of the lapsed district immediately before its lapsation, to each of the governing boards that adjoin the lapsed district, and to the high school district of which the lapsed elementary district is a component.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 327, Sec. 6.   (AB 1599)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

35783.

After the hearing, and at least 30 days before the end of the school year, the county committee shall order the territory annexed to one or more adjoining districts as seems to the county committee to be in the best interest of the adjoining districts and the residents of the lapsed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 327, Sec. 7.   (AB 1599)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

35784.

If the county committee orders the territory of a lapsed district annexed to more than one adjoining district, it may provide for such a division of the funds, property, and obligations of the lapsed district as it deems most equitable in the circumstances. If no division is provided for by the committee, the general provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 35560) of Chapter 3 shall apply to the division of funds, property, and obligations of the lapsed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35785.

Following the order of the county committee, the county superintendent of schools shall give notice of the board action to the county board of supervisors and to the State Board of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35786.

An order of a county committee attaching the territory of a lapsed school district to one or more adjoining school districts shall be effective for all purposes on the July 1 after date of the order. Notwithstanding Section 35534, the effective date of the order is not subject to compliance with Section 54900 of the Government Code. Compliance with Section 54900 of the Government Code is required by December 1 of the year in which the order is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 327, Sec. 8.   (AB 1599)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

35787.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, an action to lapse a school district is subject to the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35500), and the county committee may add to its order to lapse a school district, pursuant to Section 35783, appropriate provisions specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 35730).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 589, Sec. 3.   (AB 2662)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 22. SCHOOL OPERATIONS [37060. - 37712.]



  CHAPTER 1. Maintenance of Schools [37060. - 37086.]



  ARTICLE 5. Junior High Schools [37060. - 37086.]

37060.

The governing board of a county, a high school district, a union high school district, or a joint union high school district may establish a junior high school or a system of junior high schools.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 227.5.)
-------------------------------------------

37085.

Any school district within a junior high school or system of junior high schools, maintained by the governing board of a county, union, or joint union high school district, may withdraw from the junior high system when a majority of the qualified voters in the district voting thereat vote in favor of withdrawal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37085.5.

If a school district withdraws from a junior high school system pursuant to a vote in favor of withdrawal pursuant to Section 37085, there shall not be an election to reverse that action for at least three complete school years following the date the withdrawal occurs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 503, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

37086.

Election proceedings may be commenced upon by either of the following means:

(a) A petition signed by thirty-five percent (35%) of the registered voters residing in the district shall be presented to the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the district is situated, setting forth briefly the reasons for withdrawal and praying that the question be submitted to the voters of this district.

(b) The governing boards of all school districts involved shall agree that an election be held and shall notify the county superintendent of schools of such agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. School Calendar [37200. - 37223.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [37200. - 37202.]

37200.

The school year begins on the first day of July and ends on the last day of June.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37201.

(a) A school month is 20 days or four weeks of five days each, including legal holidays but excluding weekend makeup classes. For the purposes of counting attendance only in providing for a school calendar the winter vacation period, or any portion thereof, may be excluded by the school district in the definition of a school month.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) of this section are limited to defining a school month for attendance-counting purposes only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

37202.

(a) Except if a school has been closed by order of a city or a county board of health, or of the State Board of Health, on account of contagious disease, or if the school has been closed on account of fire, flood, or other public disaster, the governing board of a school district shall maintain all of the elementary day schools established by it for an equal length of time during the school year and all of the day high schools established by it for an equal length of time during the school year.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a school district that is implementing an early primary program, pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 8970) of Part 6, may maintain kindergarten or transitional kindergarten classes for
 different lengths of time during the schoolday, either at the same or a different schoolsite.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 20.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Saturdays and Holidays [37220. - 37223.]

37220.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, the public schools shall close on the following holidays:

(1) January 1.

(2) The third Monday in January or the Monday or Friday in the week in which January 15 occurs, known as “Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. Day.” On the Friday preceding the day on which schools are closed, schools shall include exercises commemorating and directing attention to the history of the civil rights movement in the United States and particularly the role therein of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.

(3) The Monday or Friday of the week in which February 12 occurs, known as “Lincoln Day.” On the
 day that school is in session prior to the day on which schools are closed for that purpose, all public schools and educational institutions throughout the state shall hold exercises in memory of Abraham Lincoln.

(4) The third Monday in February, known as “Washington Day.” On the Friday preceding, all public schools and educational institutions throughout the state shall hold exercises in memory of George Washington.

(5) The last Monday in May, known as “Memorial Day.”

(6) July 4.

(7) The first Monday in September, known as “Labor Day.”

(8) November 11, known as “Veterans Day.”

(9) That Thursday in November proclaimed by the
 President as “Thanksgiving Day.”

(10) December 25.

(11) All days appointed by the Governor for a public fast, thanksgiving, or holiday, and all special or limited holidays on which the Governor provides that the schools shall close.

(12) (A) All days appointed by the President as a public fast, thanksgiving, or holiday, unless it is a special or limited holiday.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “appointed by the President” includes the President signing into law legislation that creates a nationwide federal holiday, including the legal public holidays listed in subsection (a) of Section 6103 of Title 5 of the United States Code, but does not include Columbus Day. This definition is declaratory of existing law.

(13) Any other day designated as a holiday by the governing board of the school district.

(b) When any of the holidays on which the schools would be closed falls on Sunday, the public schools shall close on the Monday following.

(c) When any of the holidays on which the schools would be closed falls on Saturday, the public schools shall close on the preceding Friday, and that Friday shall be declared a state holiday.

(d) If any holiday on which the public schools are required to close pursuant to subdivision (a) occurs under federal law on a date different from the date specified in subdivision (a), the governing board of any school district may close the public schools of the district on the date recognized by federal law and maintain classes on the date
 specified in subdivision (a).

(e) Except for Veterans Day, as designated in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a), the governing board of a school district, by adoption of a resolution, may revise the date upon which the schools of the district close in observance of any of the holidays identified in subdivision (a).

(f) The governing board of a school district may not request a waiver of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) from the state board.

(g) This section does not prohibit a school district from authorizing its facilities or grounds to be used in accordance with Section 38131 on those days on which the public schools are closed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 753, Sec. 1.   (AB 1655)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

37220.5.

(a) In addition to the holidays prescribed in Section 37220, public schools may be closed on March 31, known as “Cesar Chavez Day,” or the appropriate Monday or Friday following or preceding that date, if the governing board, pursuant to a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, agrees to close schools for that purpose.

(b) On March 31 or on the day determined by the governing board, public schools and educational institutions throughout the state may include exercises, funded through existing resources, commemorating and directing attention to the history of the farm labor movement in the United States and particularly the role therein of Cesar Chavez. The State Board of Education shall adopt a model curriculum guide to be available for use by public schools for exercises related to Cesar Chavez Day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 213, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

37220.6.

(a) There is hereby created the Cesar Chavez Day of Service and Learning program to promote service to the communities of California in honor of the life and work of Cesar Chavez. The program shall be administered by the Governor’s Office on Service and Volunteerism, in collaboration with the California Conservation Corps.

(b) The Governor’s Office on Service and Volunteerism may make grants based on proposals selected through a competitive process from local and state operated Americorps, National Senior Service Corps, Learn and Serve, or Conservation Corps programs that submit proposals to engage pupils through their schools and school districts in community service that qualifies as instructional time on Cesar Chavez Day, pursuant to Section 37220.5, and that honors the life and work of Cesar Chavez. The programs shall be created and organized in consultation with community groups. The Americorps, National Senior Service Corps, Learn and Serve, or Conservation Corps programs may implement or administer the programs in collaboration with community groups and nonprofit organizations. The proposals shall demonstrate all of the following:

(1) The ways and extent to which the program will be a collaborative effort between schools and the Americorps, National Senior Service Corps, Learn and Serve, or Conservation Corps program.

(2) The ways that the service will be connected to instruction on the life and work of Cesar Chavez provided on Cesar Chavez Day.

(3) The way in which the service provided will make a meaningful contribution to the community.

(c) Grants made pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be in the amount of one dollar ($1) for each participating pupil, or two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each school, whichever is greater. The Governor’s Office on Service and Volunteerism may, at its discretion, adjust the grant amount to account for school district size, the size of the project, and the demand on existing funding. Under no circumstances may the amount granted exceed the amount of funding appropriated to carry out this section.

(d) In order for the community service performed under this program to be counted as instructional time, the service shall be performed under the supervision of a teacher, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 46300.

(e) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop or revise, as needed, a model curriculum on the life and work of Cesar Chavez and submit the model curriculum to the State Board of Education for adoption pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 37220.5. Upon adoption, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall distribute the model curriculum to each school.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that nothing in this section, or in the act that adds this section, shall be construed to impose a mandate on school districts.

(g) For the purposes of this section, “school district” includes school districts, charter schools, and county offices of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1124, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

37220.7.

(a) In addition to the holidays prescribed in Section 37220, public schools may be closed on April 24, known as “Genocide Remembrance Day,” the 15th day of the month of Kartik in the Hindu lunar calendar of each year, known as “Diwali,” and the fourth Friday in September, known as “Native American Day,” if the governing board, pursuant to a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, agrees to close schools for that purpose.

(b) On the fourth Friday in September, or if schools are closed on that date as specified in subdivision (a), on an alternate day determined by the governing board, public schools and educational institutions throughout this state may include
 exercises, funded through existing resources, commemorating and directing attention to the many contributions that Native Americans have made to this country. The State Board of Education may adopt a model curriculum guide to be available for use by public schools for exercises related to Native American Day.

(c) On April 24, or if schools are closed on that date as specified in subdivision (a), on an alternate day determined by the governing board, public schools and educational institutions throughout this state may include exercises, funded through existing resources, remembering and honoring the many contributions that survivors of genocide have made to this country. The State Board of Education may adopt a model curriculum guide to be available for use by public schools for exercises related to Genocide Remembrance Day.

(d) On the 15th day of the month of Kartik in the Hindu